data/spelling-dict/hunspell/pt_PT_90.aff
SFX P Y 353
SFX P   erer            é-la            querer
SFX P   erer            é-las           querer
SFX P   erer            é-lo            querer
SFX P   erer            é-los           querer
SFX P   or              usé-la          por
SFX P   or              usé-las         por
SFX P   or              usé-lo          por
SFX P   or              usé-los         por
SFX P   azer            izé-la          fazer
SFX P   azer            izé-las         fazer
SFX P   azer            izé-lo          fazer
SFX P   azer            izé-los         fazer
SFX P   zer             ssé-la          dizer
SFX P   zer             ssé-las         dizer
SFX P   zer             ssé-lo          dizer
SFX P   zer             ssé-los         dizer
SFX P   azer            ouxé-la         trazer
SFX P   azer            ouxé-las        trazer
SFX P   azer            ouxé-lo         trazer
SFX P   azer            ouxé-los        trazer
SFX P   0               -o              [aeiouéê]       +G=m,AN=s
SFX P   ns              m-lo            ns              +G=m,AN=s
SFX P   s               -lo             [^ná]s          +G=m,AN=s
SFX P   0               -no             m               +G=m,AN=s
SFX P   0               -a              [aeiouéê]       +G=f,AN=s
SFX P   ns              m-la            ns              +G=f,AN=s
SFX P   s               -la             [^ná]s          +G=f,AN=s
SFX P   0               -na             m               +G=f,AN=s
SFX P   0               -os             [aeiouéê]       +G=m,AN=p
SFX P   ns              m-los           ns              +G=m,AN=p
SFX P   s               -los            [^ná]s          +G=m,AN=p
SFX P   0               -nos            m               +G=m,AN=p
SFX P   0               -as             [aeiouéê]       +G=f,AN=p
SFX P   ns              m-las           ns              +G=f,AN=p
SFX P   s               -las            [^ná]s          +G=f,AN=p
SFX P   0               -nas            m               +G=f,AN=p
SFX P   z               -lo             [iu]z           +G=m,AN=s
SFX P   z               -la             [iu]z           +G=f,AN=s
SFX P   z               -los            [iu]z           +G=m,AN=p
SFX P   z               -las            [iu]z           +G=f,AN=p
SFX P   az              á-lo            az              +G=m,AN=s
SFX P   az              á-la            az              +G=f,AN=s
SFX P   az              á-los           az              +G=m,AN=p
SFX P   az              á-las           az              +G=f,AN=p
SFX P   ez              ê-lo            ez              +G=m,AN=s
SFX P   ez              ê-la            ez              +G=f,AN=s
SFX P   ez              ê-los           ez              +G=m,AN=p
SFX P   ez              ê-las           ez              +G=f,AN=p
SFX P   ar              á-lo            ar              +AG=m,AN=s
SFX P   ar              á-la            ar              +AG=f,AN=s
SFX P   ar              á-los           ar              +AG=m,AN=p
SFX P   ar              á-las           ar              +AG=f,AN=p
SFX P   ar              á-lo-ei         ar              +P=1,N=s,T=f
SFX P   ar              á-lo-ás         ar              +P=2,N=s,T=f
SFX P   ar              á-lo-á          ar              +P=3,N=s,T=f
SFX P   ar              á-lo-emos       ar              +P=1,N=p,T=f
SFX P   ar              á-lo-eis        ar              +P=2,N=p,T=f
SFX P   ar              á-lo-ão         ar              +P=3,N=p,T=f
SFX P   ar              á-lo-ia         ar              +P=1_3,N=s,T=c
SFX P   ar              á-lo-ias        ar              +P=2,N=s,T=c
SFX P   ar              á-lo-íamos      ar              +P=1,N=p,T=c
SFX P   ar              á-lo-íeis       ar              +P=2,N=p,T=c
SFX P   ar              á-lo-iam        ar              +P=3,N=p,T=c
SFX P   ar              á-los-ei         ar              +P=1,N=s,T=f
SFX P   ar              á-los-ás         ar              +P=2,N=s,T=f
SFX P   ar              á-los-á          ar              +P=3,N=s,T=f
SFX P   ar              á-los-emos       ar              +P=1,N=p,T=f
SFX P   ar              á-los-eis        ar              +P=2,N=p,T=f
SFX P   ar              á-los-ão         ar              +P=3,N=p,T=f
SFX P   ar              á-los-ia         ar              +P=1_3,N=s,T=c
SFX P   ar              á-los-ias        ar              +P=2,N=s,T=c
SFX P   ar              á-los-íamos      ar              +P=1,N=p,T=c
SFX P   ar              á-los-íeis       ar              +P=2,N=p,T=c
SFX P   ar              á-los-iam        ar              +P=3,N=p,T=c
SFX P   ar              á-la-ei         ar              +P=1,N=s,T=f
SFX P   ar              á-la-ás         ar              +P=2,N=s,T=f
SFX P   ar              á-la-á          ar              +P=3,N=s,T=f
SFX P   ar              á-la-emos       ar              +P=1,N=p,T=f
SFX P   ar              á-la-eis        ar              +P=2,N=p,T=f
SFX P   ar              á-la-ão         ar              +P=3,N=p,T=f
SFX P   ar              á-la-ia         ar              +P=1_3,N=s,T=c
SFX P   ar              á-la-ias        ar              +P=2,N=s,T=c
SFX P   ar              á-la-íamos      ar              +P=1,N=p,T=c
SFX P   ar              á-la-íeis       ar              +P=2,N=p,T=c
SFX P   ar              á-la-iam        ar              +P=3,N=p,T=c
SFX P   ar              á-las-ei         ar              +P=1,N=s,T=f
SFX P   ar              á-las-ás         ar              +P=2,N=s,T=f
SFX P   ar              á-las-á          ar              +P=3,N=s,T=f
SFX P   ar              á-las-emos       ar              +P=1,N=p,T=f
SFX P   ar              á-las-eis        ar              +P=2,N=p,T=f
SFX P   ar              á-las-ão         ar              +P=3,N=p,T=f
SFX P   ar              á-las-ia         ar              +P=1_3,N=s,T=c
SFX P   ar              á-las-ias        ar              +P=2,N=s,T=c
SFX P   ar              á-las-íamos      ar              +P=1,N=p,T=c
SFX P   ar              á-las-íeis       ar              +P=2,N=p,T=c
SFX P   ar              á-las-iam        ar              +P=3,N=p,T=c
SFX P   er              ê-la-á          [^a]bater              +P=3,N=s,T=f
SFX P   er              ê-la-ás         [^a]bater              +P=2,N=s,T=f
SFX P   er              ê-la-ão         [^a]bater              +P=3,N=p,T=f
SFX P   er              ê-la-ia         [^a]bater              +P=1_3,N=s,T=c
SFX P   er              ê-la-ias        [^a]bater              +P=2,N=s,T=c
SFX P   er              ê-la-íamos      [^a]bater              +P=1,N=p,T=c
SFX P   er              ê-la-iam        [^a]bater              +P=3,N=p,T=c
SFX P   er              ê-las-á         [^a]bater              +P=3,N=s,T=f
SFX P   er              ê-las-ás        [^a]bater              +P=2,N=s,T=f
SFX P   er              ê-las-ei        [^a]bater              +P=1,N=s,T=f
SFX P   er              ê-las-eis       [^a]bater              +P=2,N=p,T=f
SFX P   er              ê-las-ão        [^a]bater              +P=3,N=p,T=f
SFX P   er              ê-las-ia        [^a]bater              +P=1_3,N=s,T=c
SFX P   er              ê-las-ias       [^a]bater              +P=2,N=s,T=c
SFX P   er              ê-las-íamos     [^a]bater              +P=1,N=p,T=c
SFX P   er              ê-las-iam       [^a]bater              +P=3,N=p,T=c
SFX P   er              ê-los-á         [^a]bater              +P=3,N=s,T=f
SFX P   er              ê-los-ei        [^a]bater              +P=1,N=s,T=f
SFX P   er              ê-los-eis       [^a]bater              +P=2,N=p,T=f
SFX P   er              ê-los-ão        [^a]bater              +P=3,N=p,T=f
SFX P   er              ê-los-ia        [^a]bater              +P=1_3,N=s,T=c
SFX P   er              ê-los-ias       [^a]bater              +P=2,N=s,T=c
SFX P   er              ê-los-íamos     [^a]bater              +P=1,N=p,T=c
SFX P   er              ê-los-iam       [^a]bater              +P=3,N=p,T=c
