data/spelling-dict/hunspell/pt_PT_90.dic
abeirar/XYPLM
abrasileirar/XYPL
acampar/XYPLM
achar/XYPLMD
acoimar/XYPLD
acostar/XYPLSMv
adensar/XYPL
adocicar/XYPL
afamar/XYPLD
afleumar/XYPL
africanizar/XYPL
agourar/XYPL
aguilhar/XYPL
alargar/XYPLM
alegar/XYPLcnv
alicerçar/XYPL
alourar/XYPL
amadurecer/XYPLM
ambientar/XYPLc
amolecar/XYPL
amparar/XYPLSMDB
anestesiar/XYPLn
antecipar/XYPLcv
apalaçar/XYPL
aparvoar/XYPLM
apiedar/XYPL
apontar/XYPLMD
apresar/XYPLMD
aquadrilhar/XYPLM
argumentar/XYPLcDn
arrebitar/XYPL
arremeter/XYPLMDn
arruinar/YPLMD
assedar/XYPL
assobiar/XYPLDn
atapetar/XYPL
atiçoar/XYPL
atrasar/XYPLMD
auscultar/XYPLcD
avelhentar/XYPLD
avisar/XYPLD
badalar/XYPL
baralhar/XYPLMD
bemolizar/XYPL
bissetar/XYPL
brandir/XYPLM
buzinar/XYPLc
calendarizar/XYPLnc
cansar/XYPL
cariciar/XYPLv
catapultar/XYPL
celebrar/XYPLcDnv
chamejar/XYPLn
chincar/XYPL
cingir/XYPL
clarejar/XYPL
coarrendar/XYPL
colchoar/XYPL
comensurar/XYPLcv
compatibilizar/XYPLc
comunicar/XYPLcDnv
confecionar/XYPLD
conglobar/XYPLc
consonantizar/XYPLc
contextualizar/XYPLncRS
contrapesar/XYPL
convocar/XYPLcDERS
corrigir/XYPLv
credibilizar/XYPLcDS
crucifixar/XYPLcD
dançaricar/XYPL
decantar/XYPL
defletir/YPL
deleitar/XYPLcMnv
dentar/XYPL
derramar/XYPLcMD
desalentar/XYPLD
desarranjar/XYPLMD
desavir/PL
descaroçar/XYPL
desconcentrar/XYPLc
descuidar/XYPLB
desencapotar/XYPL
desengatar/XYPL
desentalar/XYPL
desfiar/XYPL
desgraduar/XYPL
deslavar/XYPLM
desmoralizar/XYPLcDn
despeitar/XYPLD
despontar/XYPLDn
destabilizar/XYPLcDS
desvariar/XYPL
dever/XYPLD
diligenciar/XYPLD
dissociar/XYPLcv
doar/XYPLcD
drogar/XYPLcMD
eletrificar/XYPLc
embalar/XYPLDE
embebedar/XYPLM
embravecer/XYPLM
empantufar/XYPL
emplumar/XYPLc
encabelar/XYPLD
encantar/XYPLcMD
encasacar/XYPL
enchouriçar/XYPL
encoronhar/XYPL
endireitar/XYPLR
enfatizar/XYPLcD
enfurecer/XYPLMD
engordar/XYPL
enlouquecer/XYPLM
enroscar/XYPLSM
ensopar/XYPL
entontecer/XYPLMD
entrosar/XYPLM
envidraçar/XYPLM
eriçar/XYPL
escalonar/XYPLRM
escarrar/XYPLD
escrutinar/XYPLcD
esgadanhar/XYPL
espacejar/XYPL
espermatizar/XYPL
esposar/XYPL
estampar/XYPLD
estirar/XYPLD
estremecer/XYPLM
esvaziar/XYPLM
exasperar/XYPLcDn
expatriar/XYPLc
extenuar/XYPLcDn
facultar/XYPL
fartar/XYPLcv
ferrar/XYPLcD
fingir/XYPLMDB
folhar/XYPL
fosforizar/XYPLc
fulanizar/XYPLnc
ganchar/XYPL
gemer/XYPLDn
gorjear/ZYPLD
guardar/XYPLD
hibridar/XYPLM
hostilizar/XYPL
iluminar/XYPLcDn
implementar/XYLcDvP
impulsionar/XYPLDM
incomodar/XYPLDn
indianizar/XYPL
inervar/XYPLc
infortunar/XYPL
inseminar/XYPLc
insubordinar/XYPLcDvB
internacionalizar/XYPLc
invadir/XYPL
irreverenciar/XYPL
jurar/XYPLMD
lambiscar/XYPL
lavrar/XYPLMDn
liberalizar/XYPLc
lixar/XYPL
luxar/XYPLc
malhar/XYPLD
manter/PLM
martelejar/XYPL
mecanizar/XYPLc
memoriar/XYPL
metabolizar/XYPLc
miniaturar/XYPL
mobilar/XYPLcD
monologar/XYPL
motorizar/XYPLc
namoricar/XYPL
nicotizar/XYPL
objetar/XYPLnv
odiar/YPLv
opalizar/XYPLc
orientar/XYPLScDR
oxigenar/XYPLcnv
palpar/XYPLcv
parear/ZYPL
pautar/XYPL
penicar/XYPL
perfetibilizar/XYPL
persuadir/XYPLcMv
pintalgar/XYPL
podar/XYPLD
portar/XYPLDn
precarizar/XYPLcD
prefigurar/XYPLc
preparar/XYPLcD
prezar/XYPLDv
programar/XYPLcDvRS
pulsar/XYPLc
radiar/XYPLcDn
reabsorver/XYPLv
recarregar/XYPLv
recriar/XYPLc
reformular/XYPL
rejurar/XYPL
render/XYPLMv
repugnar/XYPLDn
ressoar/XYPLDn
reutilizar/XYPLc
rodar/XYPLn
salientar/XYPL
segredar/XYPL
simplificar/XYPLcDv
sobrevoar/XYPL
subalternizar/XYPLc
sulfatar/XYPLD
taludar/XYPL
terraplanar/XYPL
torvar/XYPLcM
transportar/XYPLcMDv
trufar/XYPL
variar/XYPLcnv
vilipendiar/XYPL
vulcanizar/XYPLcD
pressinta/PL
investimos/PLRS
serve/PL
transgridais/PL
averiguam/PL
coibis/PL
consome/PL
meças/PLR
instruem/PL
instruí/PL
puséreis/PLR
componho/PLR
compuséssemos/PLR
corroíeis/PL
corroías/PL
moereis/PL
remoamos/PL
remoeríeis/PL
roêreis/PL
consegue/PL
prossigam/PL
dou/PL
darmos/PL
vejas/PL
reveríeis/PL
prevemos/PL
preveja/PL
entreverás/PL
entrevísseis/PL
tens/PL
tiverdes/PL
detinham/PL
mantido/PL
mantivera/PL
obteremos/PL
obtenhais/PL
reteriam/PL
retiveres/PL
trareis/PL
quisemos/LP
há/PL
houvemos/PL
leem/PL
sejamos/PL
enxagúe/PL
escalar/DLMPRXYmp
posto/LPRlp
paro/LP
for/LP
